Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 3
SAVINGS PLANS

23-3.1-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that a choice of education opportunities will benefit the residents of the state of Colorado and that the establishment of a college savings program will enhance the availability of postsecondary educational opportunities for residents. It is the intent of the general assembly to achieve this purpose through a public-private partnership using selected financial institutions to serve as account holders and managers of individual college savings accounts.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that the college savings program can enhance the availability of postsecondary educational opportunities for adults who are already in the workforce and therefore encourages adults to take advantage of the college savings program to further their own postsecondary educational opportunities and job retraining goals.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that the establishment of a savings program that qualifies under section 529A of the internal revenue code will:

Assist individuals and families in saving money for the purpose of supporting individuals with disabilities in maintaining health, independence, and quality of life; and

Provide secure funding for disability-related expenses on behalf of designated beneficiaries with disabilities that will supplement, but not supplant, benefits provided through private insurance, the medicaid program under Title XIX of the "Social Security Act", the supplemental security income program under Title XVI of the "Social Security Act", the beneficiary's employment, and other sources.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 454, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1287, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 573, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-202), ch. 396, p. 1881, § 1, effective June 9.

L. 2015:

(3) added, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1047, § 2, effective June 3.

23-3.1-302. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"ABLE" means achieving a better life experience, as used in the federal "Stephen Beck, Jr., Achieving a Better Life Experience Act of 2014", division B, Pub.L. 113-295, as that act amends the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, to add section 529A and other federal laws.

(1.5) "ABLE savings program" means the savings program established under this part 3 pursuant to section 529A of the internal revenue code.

(1.6) "Account" means an individual trust account or savings account established pursuant to this part 3.

"Account owner" means the person designated as the account owner pursuant to section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable.

(2.5) "Adult learner" means an account owner under the college savings program who is also the account beneficiary and who opens an account in pursuit of his or her own postsecondary educational opportunities and job retraining goals.

"Authority" means collegeinvest, transferred to the department of higher education and existing as a division of that department pursuant to section 23-3.1-203.

(3.5) "College savings program" means the college savings program established under this part 3 pursuant to section 529 of the internal revenue code.

"Designated beneficiary" or "beneficiary" means, with respect to an account, the person designated at the time the account is opened, or the person who replaces a designated beneficiary, as the person whose qualified higher education expenses or qualified disability expenses are expected to be paid from the account.

"Eligible educational institution" has the same meaning as that term is defined in section 529 of the internal revenue code.

(5.5) "Executive director" means the executive director of the department of higher education.

(5.7) "Federal ABLE act" means the "Stephen Beck, Jr., Achieving a Better Life Experience Act of 2014", division B, Pub.L. 113-295, and any amendments to the act.

"Financial institution" means any state bank, state trust company, savings and loan association, credit union chartered by the state of Colorado, national bank, broker-dealer, mutual fund, insurance company, or other similar financial entity qualified to do business in the state of Colorado.

"Internal revenue code" means the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and regulations implementing the code.

"Manager" means a financial institution under contract with the authority to serve as an administrator of the program and recipient of contributions on behalf of the program.

"Member of the family" has the same meaning as that term is defined in section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable.

"Nonqualified withdrawal" means a withdrawal from an account other than a qualified withdrawal.

"Program" means the college savings program or the ABLE savings program established pursuant to this part 3, as applicable.

(11.5) "Qualified disability expenses" has the same meaning as that term is defined in section 529A of the internal revenue code.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (12) is effective until January 1, 2023.] "Qualified higher education expenses" has the same meaning as that term is defined in section 529 of the internal revenue code.

(12)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (12) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

"Qualified higher education expenses" has the same meaning as that term is defined in section 529 (e)(3) of the internal revenue code, and expenses for fees, books, supplies, and equipment required for the participation of a designated beneficiary in an apprenticeship program as defined in section 529 (c)(8) of the internal revenue code.

"Qualified withdrawal" means a withdrawal from an account, to pay any qualified expenses of the designated beneficiary of the account, a withdrawal made on account of the death or disability of the designated beneficiary, or a withdrawal made on account of a scholarship, but only if the withdrawal is made in accordance with section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable.

"Savings contract" means an agreement entered into by the authority and an account owner to participate and establish an account in the program.

"Savings trust fund" means the trust for either the college savings program or the trust for the ABLE savings program, consisting of the accounts for that program.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 454, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1287, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 574, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2.5) added and (4) amended, (SB 10-202), ch. 396, p. 1881, § 2, effective June 9.

L. 2013:

(6) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1487, § 66, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1047, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2022:

(12) amended, (HB 22-1310), ch. 369, p. 2624, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

23-3.1-303. Department - purpose - powers - duties. (Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1288, § 16, effective May 26, 2000.)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 456, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1288, § 16, effective May 26.

23-3.1-304. Authority - purpose - powers - duties.

In addition to any other powers or duties specifically granted to the authority in part 2 of this article 3.1 and in this part 3 the authority shall, as applicable to the respective program:

Develop and implement the college savings program and the ABLE savings program in a manner consistent with this part 3 and with sections 529 and 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable, through the adoption of guidelines and procedures;

Select the financial institution or institutions, and enter into a contract with said institution or institutions to serve as managers and to invest the contributions deposited into the accounts;

Establish rules regarding withdrawal of funds, which rules shall include provisions that will enable the authority or the manager to determine if a withdrawal is a nonqualified withdrawal or a qualified withdrawal;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1288, § 16, effective May 26, 2000.)

Seek rulings and other guidance from the United States department of the treasury, the internal revenue service, and the securities and exchange commission relating to the program as is necessary for proper implementation and development of the program;

Make changes to the program required in order for account owners and beneficiaries and the program to obtain or maintain federal income tax benefits or treatment provided by section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable, and exemptions under federal securities laws;

When establishing policies, guidelines, and procedures, interpret the provisions of this part 3 broadly in light of the purpose and objectives set forth in this part 3;

Charge, impose, and collect administrative fees and service charges in connection with any agreement, contract, or transaction relating to the program in amounts not exceeding the cost of establishing and administering the program, including the funding of scholarships and other grants;

Approve the application and review, for purposes of compliance with applicable laws and regulations, any informational materials utilized by the manager to be furnished to persons who desire to participate in a program established in this part 3;

Repealed.

Require that every contract, application, deposit slip, or other similar document that may be used in connection with a contribution to an account clearly indicate that the account is not insured by this state and neither the principal deposited nor the investment return is guaranteed by the state;

Make and execute savings contracts with account owners;

Develop and implement a plan to promote the use of accounts in the college savings program by adult learners;

Develop and implement procedures to allow an employer to make a matching contribution to an adult learner's account for any contribution made by the adult learner; except that any employer matching contribution shall be subtracted from federal taxable income pursuant to section 39-22-104 (4)(o), C.R.S., to the extent that the contribution is included in federal taxable income;

Develop procedures to provide college planning and preparation for adult learners through the state-provided, free online career, education, and training resource created pursuant to section

24-46.3-106

;

Develop procedures for coordinating with the department of labor and employment to make information regarding accounts for adult learners available to potential participants;

Do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes of this part 3.

Notwithstanding the restrictions in section 23-3.1-216, the authority is hereby authorized to contract with one or more financial institutions pursuant to section 23-3.1-305 to act as managers for the investment of contributions related to this program in stocks, bonds, mutual funds, and other such investments as deemed appropriate by the authority. In so doing, the authority shall be bound by the fiduciary duty described in section 15-1-304, C.R.S., and shall assure that investments by the managers are made with judgment and care that persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of the property of another, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of funds, considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of capital. The funds contributed to the accounts established by account owners pursuant to this section are held in trust by the authority and the manager for the sole benefit of the account owner and beneficiary. These contributions are not subject to any limitations on the investment of public funds and are not subject to section 20 of article X of the state constitution, which limits fiscal year spending of state government and other districts.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 456, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1288, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2008:

IP(1) and (1)(h) amended, p. 207, § 7, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(n) amended and (1)(o), (1)(p), (1)(q), and (1)(r) added, (SB 10-202), ch. 396, p. 1882, § 3, effective June 9.

L. 2015:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(f), (1)(i), (1)(m), and (1)(n) amended and (1)(j) and (1)(k) repealed, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1049, § 4, effective June 3.

L. 2020:

IP(1) and (1)(p) amended, (HB 20-1396), ch. 138, p. 601, § 7, effective September 14.

23-3.1-305. Financial institutions - managers - purpose - selection - requirements - contracts.

The authority shall implement the program through the use of one or more financial institutions to act as managers. Under the program, potential account owners may establish accounts through the program at the financial institution.

The authority shall solicit proposals from financial institutions to act as the recipients of contributions and managers.

The authority shall select from among bidding financial institutions one or more financial institutions that demonstrate the most advantageous combination to account owners and beneficiaries, based on the following factors:

Financial stability and integrity;

The ability of the financial institution, directly or through a subcontract, to satisfy record-keeping and reporting requirements;

The financial institution's plan for promoting the program and the investment that the financial institution is willing to make in order to promote the program;

Repealed.

The fees, if any, proposed to be charged to account owners for maintaining accounts;

The minimum initial cash contribution and minimum contributions that the financial institution will require, and the willingness of the financial institution to accept contributions through payroll deduction plans or systematic deposit plans; and

Any other benefits to the state or to its residents, included in the proposal, including an account opening fee payable to the authority by the account owner.

The authority shall contract with one or more financial institutions, in accordance with subsection (5) of this section, to serve as managers and to invest the contributions to accounts. On May 26, 2000, the effective date of Senate Bill 00-164, as enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-second general assembly, pursuant to section 23-3.1-205.3, the authority shall succeed to all rights and obligations under any such existing contracts.

The authority may select more than one financial institution for the program unless the United States internal revenue service provides guidance that giving a contributor a choice of two or more financial institutions will cause the program to fail to qualify for favorable tax treatment under section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable, and the authority concludes that the choice of two or more financial institutions is in the best interest of account owners and beneficiaries and will not interfere with the promotion of the program.

(5.5) The authority may select a financial institution pursuant to subsection (3) of this section without regard to the provisions of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S.

A manager shall:

Take all actions required to keep the program in compliance with the requirements of this part 3 and to ensure that the program is treated as a qualified state tuition plan under section 529 of the internal revenue code or a qualified ABLE savings program under section 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable, and to ensure that the program is exempt from registration under the federal securities law;

Keep adequate and separate records of each account and provide the authority with the information necessary to prepare the reports required by section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable, or file these reports on behalf of the authority;

Compile and total information contained in statements required to be prepared pursuant to section 23-3.1-306 (16) and (17) and provide these compilations to the authority;

Provide representatives of the authority access to the books and records of the manager to the extent needed to determine compliance with the contract;

Hold all accounts in trust for the sole benefit of the account owner and beneficiary on behalf of the program, acting in a fiduciary capacity and making investments with judgment, care, and prudence as described in section 15-1-304, C.R.S.; and

Develop a plan to promote the program and, after approval of such plan by the authority, promote the program in accordance with the plan.

Any contract executed between the authority and a financial institution pursuant to this section shall be for a term of at least five years and may be renewable.

If a contract executed between the authority and a financial institution pursuant to this section is not renewed, all of the following conditions shall apply at the end of the term of the nonrenewed contract, so long as applying these conditions does not disqualify the program as a qualified state tuition plan under section 529 of the internal revenue code or a qualified ABLE savings program under section 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable:

The authority shall continue to maintain the program at the financial institution;

Accounts previously established at the financial institution shall not be terminated, except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection (8) or as provided in subsection (9) of this section;

Additional contributions may be made to the accounts;

No new accounts may be placed with that financial institution; and

If the authority determines that continuing the accounts at the financial institution is not in the best interest of the account owners, or if the financial institution has elected not to renew the contract, the accounts may be transferred to another financial institution under contract with the authority.

The authority may terminate a contract with a financial institution at any time. If a contract is terminated pursuant to this subsection (9), the authority shall take custody of accounts held at that financial institution and shall seek to promptly transfer the accounts to another financial institution that is selected as a manager and into investment instruments as similar to the original investments as possible pursuant to the guidelines established in section 23-3.1-306 (13). The authority may select the successor financial institution without regard to the provisions of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S.

With respect to the college savings program, the authority shall work with the managers of the program in place on June 9, 2010, and any future managers to determine the most effective savings options offered by the managers for account owners who are adult learners. Each manager of the program that promotes the program pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection (6) of this section shall develop and implement a plan to expand the promotion of the program to encourage adult learners to participate in the program in pursuit of their own postsecondary educational opportunities and job retraining goals.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 457, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1290, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2008:

(8)(e) amended, p. 207, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(10) added, (SB 10-202), ch. 396, p. 1882, § 4, effective June 9.

L. 2015:

(3)(d) repealed and (5), (6)(a), (6)(b), IP(8), and (10) amended; (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1050, § 5, effective June 3.

23-3.1-306. Accounts - contributions - withdrawals - penalties - statements.

The program shall be operated through the use of accounts. A person may open an account by satisfying each of the following requirements:

Completing an application in the form prescribed by the financial institution and approved by the authority, and in accordance with the provisions of section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable. At a minimum, said application shall include the following information:

The name, address, and social security number or employer identification number of any person that contributes to the account;

The name, address, and social security number or employer identification number of the account owner;

The name, address, social security number or employer identification number, and date of birth of the designated beneficiary;

(III.5) For the ABLE savings program, a disability certificate and other documentation as required pursuant to section 529A of the internal revenue code; and

Repealed.

Any other information that the authority may deem necessary.

Making the minimum contribution required by the financial institution to open an account.

Any person may make contributions to an account, consistent with the terms established by the authority, after the account is opened.

Contributions to accounts shall be made in cash only, unless otherwise permitted pursuant to section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code.

Account owners may withdraw all or part of the balance from an account upon giving sixty days' notice, or upon such shorter period as may be authorized by the authority pursuant to rules established by the authority, including any applicable fees and penalties.

An account owner may change the designated beneficiary of an account in accordance with the provisions of section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable, and the procedures established by the authority.

At the direction of the account owner, all or a portion of an account may be transferred to another account or rolled over in accordance with the provisions of section 529 or 529A of the internal revenue code, whichever is applicable, and the procedures established by the authority.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Each account shall be accounted for separately from all other accounts under the program.

Separate records and accounting shall be maintained for each account for each designated beneficiary.

To the extent permitted by federal law, a contributor to, an account owner of, or a designated beneficiary of any account may direct the investment of any contribution to an account or the earnings from the account.

If the authority terminates the contract of a financial institution to hold accounts and accounts must be moved from that financial institution to another financial institution, the authority shall select the financial institution to which the balances of the accounts are moved.

Neither an account owner nor a designated beneficiary may use an interest in an account as a security for a loan. Any pledge of an interest in an account is of no force and effect.

If there is any distribution from an account to any person or for the benefit of any person during the calendar year, the distribution shall be reported to the internal revenue service and to the account owner or the designated beneficiary to the extent required by federal law.

The financial institution shall provide statements to each account owner at least once each year.

Statements and information returns relating to accounts shall be prepared and filed to the extent required by federal or state tax law.

[Editor's note: Subsection (18) is effective January 1, 2023.] In the case of an ABLE savings program account, a person other than the account owner may establish an account and have signature authority over an account on behalf of the account owner in accordance with section 529A of the internal revenue code and the regulations promulgated under that section.

The authority shall adopt any guidelines and procedures that are necessary to allow a person other than the account owner to establish an ABLE savings program account and have signature authority over such an account in accordance with this subsection (18).

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 460, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire part amended, p. 1292, § 16, effective May 26.

L. 2010:

IP(1) amended, (SB 10-202), ch. 396, p. 1883, § 5, effective June 9.

L. 2015:

IP(1), IP(1)(a), (3), (5), (6), (12), and (16) amended, (1)(a)(III.5) added, and (1)(a)(IV), (7), (8), and (9) repealed, (HB 15-1359), ch. 269, p. 1051, § 6, effective June 3.

L. 2022:

(18) added, (HB 22-1320), ch. 241, p. 1783, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

23-3.1-306.5. College kickstarter account program - funding - administration - financial literacy course - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Empirical evidence gathered over the last several years documents the potential of college savings accounts to expand educational and economic opportunity, especially for low- and moderate-income families;

College savings accounts improve early child development and future financial capability because:

Children who receive a college savings account at birth score better on socio-emotional development indicators than children who do not receive a college savings account;

Families with children who receive a seeded college savings account at birth save significantly more for college than families of children who do not receive such an account; and

Compared to children without savings, children with savings accumulate significantly more savings as adults;

Having a college savings account increases a child's expectation of going to college, and, among children aged twelve to eighteen, those who have a college savings account are twice as likely to expect to go to college as those who do not have a college savings account because college savings accounts promote the importance of higher education and make the future feel more proximate for children;

Children who have college savings do better academically, and even a small amount of college savings can substantially increase college enrollment and graduation, especially for low- and moderate-income children, as such children with five hundred dollars or less in savings were three times more likely to enroll in college and four times more likely to graduate than children with no savings; and

Providing seed money for each child born in Colorado as an incentive to enroll in a college savings account helps make saving for college part of the collective culture of Colorado by opening the door for economic opportunity for all children and their families, better positions the state as a pioneer in building family financial capability, and promotes the development of a stronger, more qualified Colorado workforce.

The general assembly further finds and declares that establishing the college kickstarter account program, which provides both an initial contribution of money for every child born in Colorado that may be claimed and transferred to a college savings account and subsequently supplemented by parental and family contributions and a potential opportunity for financial literacy education free of charge:

Creates a public-private partnership and state-level plan aimed at transforming the college aspirations and attendance of thousands of Colorado children; and

Provides a promising means of increasing academic performance and self-esteem in a child's early years and college enrollment and degree attainment in the long term.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible child" means a child born or adopted in Colorado on or after January 1, 2020, but before January 1, 2040.

"Fund" means the college kickstarter account program fund created in subsection (8)(a) of this section.

"Inflation" means the annual percentage change in the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban consumers, or its successor index.

"Kickstarter funding" means an amount in the master account designated for each eligible child by the authority, which the parent or parents of the eligible child can claim on behalf of the eligible child by opening an account for the eligible child, as follows:

One hundred dollars for each eligible child born before January 1, 2021; or

One hundred dollars, annually adjusted for inflation for each year beginning on or after January 1, 2021, for each eligible child born on or after January 1, 2021.

"Kickstarter program" means the college kickstarter account program created in subsection (3) of this section.

"Master account" means the account established by the authority as required by subsection (4) of this section.

"Parent or parents" means each individual identified on the birth certificate as the mother or father of a child or, if the child is adopted, identified on the report of adoption forwarded to the state registrar as required by section 25-2-107 (1), or, if no such person is the legal guardian of a child, the legal guardian of the child.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, the authority shall oversee and administer the college kickstarter account program, which is created within the authority. The department shall create an advisory board, which shall include, at a minimum, the state treasurer or the state treasurer's designee and both an employee of the department who is not an employee of the authority and an employee of the authority, to advise the authority regarding the oversight and administration of the kickstarter program. The advisory board is subject to the open meetings provisions of the Colorado sunshine law contained in part 4 of article 6 of title 24 and the "Colorado Open Records Act", article 72 of title 24.

The authority shall create a kickstarter program master account. By increasing available revenue, without reducing existing levels of scholarship or matching grant funding, the authority shall annually deposit to the master account for state fiscal year 2019-20 and for each succeeding state fiscal year thereafter through state fiscal year 2044-45 the amount needed to ensure that there is sufficient money in the master account to make all transfers of kickstarter funding from the master account to accounts that name an eligible child as the beneficiary required by subsection (4)(b) of this section during the state fiscal year for which the transfer is made. Notwithstanding any other law, the amounts to be transferred shall be taken from money of the authority that is available for use by the authority for the Colorado collegeinvest scholarship program created in section 23-3.1-206.9 (1) or for the authority's matching grant program.

The authority shall designate kickstarter funding in the master account for each eligible child upon receiving notice of the birth or adoption of the eligible child from the office of the state registrar of vital statistics in the department of public health and environment, created in section 25-2-103 (1), as required by section 25-2-112 (8). The authority shall initially invest the kickstarter funding in its stable value plus plan or any successor plan that has a similar investment strategy. If the parent or parents of an eligible child open an account, which they may do without making any additional contribution, that names the child as the beneficiary within five years of the date of the eligible child's birth or adoption, the authority shall transfer the kickstarter funding designated for the eligible child and any associated interest from the master account to the eligible child's account. If the parent or parents of an eligible child do not open an account that names the eligible child as a beneficiary within five years of the eligible child's birth or adoption, any money in the master account that was designated for the eligible child remains in the master account and may be designated for another eligible child. Kickstarter funding and any associated interest, whether it is designated for an eligible child in the master account or in an account that names an eligible child as the beneficiary, is excluded from the income of the eligible child and the parent or parents of the eligible child for purposes of determining eligibility or benefits amounts for any state-funded program.

The authority, in consultation with the advisory board created in subsection (3) of this section, shall develop and, no later than November 1, 2019, obtain the approval of the department to implement, directly or through a contractor, a comprehensive and robust marketing and outreach plan to make the parent or parents of each eligible child aware of the kickstarter program and encourage them to claim the kickstarter funding designated for their eligible child by enrolling in an account. The marketing and outreach plan shall include multiple strategies, including grants to appropriate community-based nonprofit organizations, to specifically target low- and middle-income families who may be less likely than wealthier families to already be aware of the authority and the availability of accounts. Upon making initial contact with the parent or parents of an eligible child, the authority or its contractor shall:

Educate the parent or parents as to how to claim the designated kickstarter funding for their eligible child by enrolling in an account, make future contributions to the account, choose from available fund options for the investment of the account, and contact the authority regarding questions concerning the account;

Advise the parent or parents of the opportunity to take any financial literacy education program provided by the state treasurer as authorized in subsection (5) of this section; and

Provide a simple enrollment process and call center support.

Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly with respect to any money in the master account that is not custodial money obtained through gifts, grants, or donations only, the authority may expend any money in the master account that is not kickstarter funding or associated interest and is not anticipated to be needed for future designation as kickstarter funding to defray the costs of developing, implementing, marketing, and administering the kickstarter program in compliance with all applicable federal and state laws, rules, and regulations.

If, in the sole discretion of the state treasurer, adequate gifts, grants, and donations are received, the kickstarter program may include a free program for financial literacy education for eligible children and their parent or parents and other family members. The state treasurer shall develop and administer any program for financial literacy education included in the kickstarter program.

The authority shall conduct an ongoing summative evaluation to collect summative data to evaluate the kickstarter program's effectiveness over time. The authority shall prepare, present to the committees of reference of the general assembly to which the department is assigned pursuant to section 2-7-203 (1), and conspicuously post on its website an annual written report on the results of the ongoing summative evaluation, which report shall include, at a minimum:

A descriptive and evaluative summary of the marketing and outreach plan for the kickstarter program developed and implemented as required by subsection (4)(c) of this section, including a description of the strategies used and an assessment of the successes and failures of the plan generally and of the individual strategies used; and

Statistical summaries of the usage of the kickstarter program both for the past calendar year and for the life of the program that include:

The number of eligible children born or adopted;

The number of eligible children, and the percentage of all eligible children, for whom the parent or parents claimed kickstarter funding by opening accounts;

The number of families who had not opened an account for any of their children before January 1, 2020, who opened an account for an eligible child or for any of their other children on or after January 1, 2020, and the total number of accounts opened by such families;

To the extent that such information is available, the number of accounts opened for both eligible children and other children by low-income, middle-income, and high-income families;

The number of accounts opened for both eligible children and other children, and the percentage of all accounts opened for both eligible children and for other children, in each county; and

The number and percentage of all families claiming kickstarter funding for an eligible child by opening an account:

Who did not make additional contributions to the account; and

Who did, or for whom others did, make additional contributions to the account.

The kickstarter program is intended to be a public-private partnership, with the authority designating kickstarter funding for each eligible child within the master account and transferring the kickstarter funding into an individual college savings account for each eligible child when the parent or parents of the eligible child claim the kickstarter funding by opening the account and the state treasurer working with a private partner to develop a free program of financial literacy education for eligible children and their parent or parents and other family members. The state treasurer may seek to enter into agreements with private foundations or other entities to fund, develop, and implement the financial literacy education program component of the kickstarter program, and the authority may seek to enter into agreements with such private foundations or other entities to provide additional funding for the kickstarter program.

The college kickstarter account program fund is created in the state treasury. The fund consists of gifts, grants, and donations credited to the fund pursuant to this section.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

The authority may expend money from the fund for any kickstarter program purpose, and the state treasurer may expend money from the fund for the purpose of developing and implementing a free program of financial literacy education for eligible children and their parent or parents and other family members as authorized in subsection (5) of this section.

The state treasurer, the department, and the authority may seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section. The receiving entity shall transmit all money received through gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the fund.

The authority may adopt rules that it deems necessary for the implementation and administration of the kickstarter program.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1280), ch. 158, p. 1874, § 1, effective August 2.